Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1055
Attachment in actions on claims not due; procedure in general.

The proceedings under general attachment provided for in sections 25-1004 to 25-1041, so far as they are applicable, shall regulate the attachments authorized on claims before due.

R.S.1867, Code § 243, p. 433;

R.S.1913, § 7784;

R.S.1922, § 8728;

C.S.1929, § 20-1055;

R.S.1943, § 25-1055.

Previous sections of this article regulate attachments before judgment. Insurance Co. of North America v. Maxim's of Nebraska, 178 Neb. 274, 132 N.W.2d 885 (1965).